North Carolina, session 2025, SB391.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
REGULATION OF DRIVERS EDUCATION OFFERED BY COMMERCIAL DRIVER
TRAINING SCHOOLS
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-322 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-322. Licenses for schools necessary; regulations as to requirements.
(a) No commercial driver training school shall be established nor any such existing
school be continued on or after July 1, 1965, unless such school applies for and obtains from the
Commissioner a license in the manner and form prescribed by the Commissioner.
(b) Regulations adopted by the Commissioner shall state the requirements for a school
license, including requirements concerning location, equipment, courses of instruction,
instructors, financial statements, schedule of fees and charges, character and reputation of the
operators, insurance, bond or other security in such sum and with such provisions as the
Commissioner deems necessary to protect adequately the interests of the public, and such other
matters as the Commissioner may prescribe. A driver education course offered to prepare an
individual for a limited learner's permit or another provisional license must meet the requirements
set in G.S. 115C-215 for the program of driver education offered in the public schools.
(c) Regulations adopted by the Commissioner for the course of instruction to be offered
by commercial driver training schools to prepare an individual for a limited learner's permit or
another provisional license must include, but are not limited to, the curriculum requirements in
G.S. 115C-215(b).
(d) In addition to regulations adopted by the Commissioner under subsection (c) of this
section, commercial driver training schools providing courses to prepare an individual for a
limited learner's permit or another provisional license through the public schools must meet all
requirements set in G.S. 115C-215 for the program of driver education offered in the public
schools."
DEALER LICENSE RENEWAL FIX
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-288(b2) reads as rewritten:
"(b2) For a licensed dealer, manufacturer, factory branch, distributor, distributor branch, or
wholesaler applying for renewal, the death of a co-owner in the licensed business entity shall not
be considered a change of ownership for purposes of licensure, as long as the business entity has
no new co-owners or changes in structure of the business entity. The applicant a change in
ownership is not grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, as long as any new
owner is otherwise qualified for licensure and approved by the Division. The licensee shall be
considered by the Division to be a continuing business for purposes of renewal and shall not be
required to apply for a license as a new business."
CHANGE CASH BALANCE REQUIREMENT TO CASH ON HAND
*S391-v-8*

SECTION 3. G.S. 143C-6-11 reads as rewritten:
"§ 143C-6-11. Highway appropriation.
…
(f) Seven and One Half Percent (7.5%) Cash Balance Required. – The Department of
Transportation shall maintain an available cash balance at the end of each month to an amount
equal to at least seven and one half percent (7.5%) a minimum of 45 days of the total
appropriations for the current fiscal year from the Highway Fund and the Highway Trust Fund.
In projecting cash balances in future years, the Department shall use the estimated cash flow as
specified in the Current Operations Appropriation Act. No further transportation project contract
commitment may be entered into that would cause the cash position to fall below this
requirement. In the event this cash position is not maintained, no further transportation project
contract commitments may be entered into until the cash balance has been regained. Provided
the Department may modify or supplement transportation contract commitments for existing
transportation projects that (i) result in a savings from the total estimated project cost of the
existing commitment, based on a cost-savings analysis, or (ii) relate to the needs of an existing
transportation project to continue. Any federal funds on hand shall not be considered as cash for
the purposes of this subsection.
…
(k) The Department of Transportation shall do all of the following:
(1) Utilize cash flow financing to the extent possible to fund transportation
projects with the goal of reducing the combined average daily cash balance of
the Highway Fund and the Highway Trust Fund to an amount equal to between
fifteen and twenty percent (15-20%) 75 and 120 days of the total
appropriations for the current fiscal year from those funds. In projecting cash
balances in future years, the Department shall use the estimated cash flow as
specified in the Current Operations Appropriation Act. Any federal funds on
hand shall not be considered as cash for the purposes of this subsection. The
target amount shall include an amount necessary to make all municipal-aid
funding requirements of the Department.
…."
ELIMINATE TURNPIKE AUTHORITY REPORTING REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 4. G.S. 136-89.193 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-89.193. Annual plan of work; annual and quarterly reports.report.
(a) Annual Plan of Work. – The Authority shall annually develop a plan of work for the
fiscal year, describing the activities and projects to be undertaken, accompanied by a budget.
This annual plan of work shall be subject to the concurrence of the Board of Transportation.
(b) Annual Reports. Report. – The Authority shall, promptly following the close of each
fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding fiscal year and an annual
audit of its books and accounts for the preceding fiscal year to the Governor, the General
Assembly, and the Department of Transportation. The report and audit shall be submitted no later
than October 31 of the fiscal year in which the report and audit are completed.
The North Carolina Turnpike Authority shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation
Oversight Committee on January 31, 2017, and in its annual report thereafter, the number of
one-time toll facility users who are charged more than fifty dollars ($50.00) in processing fees
imposed under G.S. 136-89.215 and civil penalties assessed under G.S. 136-89.216.
(c) Repealed by Session Laws 2016-90, s. 4, effective July 11, 2016.
(d) Report Prior to Let of Contracts. – The Authority shall consult with and report to the
Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee and the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations prior to the letting of any contract for Turnpike Project construction
authorized under G.S. 136-183(a)(2).
Page 2 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

(e) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 28.35(a), effective July 1, 2011."
TURNPIKE UNPAID TOLL NOTICE BY ELECTRONIC MAIL
SECTION 5. G.S. 136-89.214(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Bill. – If a motor vehicle travels on a Turnpike project that uses an open road tolling
system and a toll for traveling on the project is not paid prior to travel or at the time of travel, the
Authority must send a bill by first-class mail to the registered owner of the motor vehicle or the
person who had care, custody, and control of the vehicle as established under G.S. 136-89.212(b)
for the amount of the unpaid toll; provided, however, that with the written consent of the
registered owner of the motor vehicle or the person who had care, custody, and control of the
vehicle as set forth above, the Authority may send the bill via electronic mail to a designated
electronic mail account or electronic mail account on file with any state Department of Motor
Vehicles rather than by first-class mail. The Authority must send the bill within 90 days after the
travel occurs, or within 90 days of receipt of a sworn affidavit submitted under
G.S. 136-89.212(b) identifying the person who had care, custody, and control of the motor
vehicle. If a bill is not sent within the required time, the Authority waives collection of the toll.
The Authority must establish a billing period for unpaid open road tolls that is no shorter than 15
days. A bill for a billing period must include all unpaid tolls incurred by the same person during
the billing period."
REMOVE LIMIT ON TURNPIKE PROJECTS
SECTION 6. G.S. 136-89.183(a)(2) reads as rewritten:
"(2) To study, plan, develop, and undertake preliminary design work on Turnpike
Projects. At the conclusion of these activities, the Turnpike Authority is
authorized to design, establish, purchase, construct, operate, and maintain no
more than eleven projects, which shall include include, but not be limited to,
the following:
a. Triangle Expressway, including segments also known as N.C. 540,
Triangle Parkway, Phases 1 and 2 of Complete 540, and the Western
Wake Freeway in Wake and Durham Counties. The described
segments constitute one project.
b. Repealed by Session Laws 2013-183, s. 5.1, effective July 1, 2013.
c. Monroe Connector/Bypass.
d., e. Repealed by Session Laws 2013-183, s. 5.1, effective July 1, 2013.
f. Repealed by Session Laws 2008-225, s. 4, effective August 17, 2008.
Any other project proposed by the Authority in addition to the projects listed
in this subdivision requires prior consultation with the Joint Legislative
Commission on Governmental Operations pursuant to G.S. 120-76.1 no less
than 180 days prior to initiating the process required by Article 7 of Chapter
159 of the General Statutes.
With the exception of the two projects set forth in sub subdivisions a. and c.
of this subdivision, the Turnpike projects selected for construction by the
Turnpike Authority, prior to the letting of a contract for the project, shall meet
the following conditions: (i) two of the projects must be ranked in the top 35
based on total score on the Department produced list entitled "Mobility Fund
Project Scores" dated June 6, 2012, and, in addition, may be subject to
G.S. 136-18(39a); (ii) of the projects not ranked as provided in (i), one may
be subject to G.S. 136-18(39a); (iii) the projects shall be included in any
applicable locally adopted comprehensive transportation plans; (iv) the
projects shall be shown in the current State Transportation Improvement
Program; and (v) toll projects must be approved by all affected Metropolitan
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 3

Planning Organizations and Rural Transportation Planning Organizations for
tolling."
REVISIONS TO BRIDGE PROGRAM OUTSOURCING
SECTION 8. G.S. 136-76.2(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) Outsourcing. – Except for the following activities, all projects funded under the bridge
program established under subsection (a) of this section shall be outsourced to private
contractors:
(1) Inspection.
(2) Pre-engineering.
(3) Contract preparation.
(4) Contract administration and oversight.
(5) Planning activities.
(6) Installation of culverts and structures described in subsection (b) of this
section, but only in cases of emergency.section on low volume or non-outlet
roads, with a cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) or less per
project."
EXEMPT FERRY DIVISION FROM TEMPORARY SOLUTIONS PROGRAM
SECTION 9. G.S. 126-6.3(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Use of Temporary Solutions Required for Cabinet Agencies. – Notwithstanding
G.S. 126-5 or any other provision of law, all Cabinet agencies that utilize temporary employees
to perform work that is not information technology-related shall employ them through the
Temporary Solutions Program administered by the Office of State Human Resources (OSHR).
Council of State agencies may use the Temporary Solutions Program in the discretion of the
agency. The Department of Transportation, Ferry Division, is exempt from the required use of
the Temporary Solutions Program when there is an established need for peak season hires or
when the work requires a specific skill set beyond the scope of temporary employees."
MODIFY REPORT TO GENERAL ASSEMBLY
SECTION 10. G.S. 136-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-12. Reports to General Assembly; Transportation Improvement Program
submitted to members and staff of General Assembly.
(a) The Department of Transportation shall shall, on or before the tenth day after the
convening of each regular session of the General Assembly, submit a full printed and detailed
report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee by March 1 of each year on
how the previous fiscal year's funds for the General Assembly that includes the cost of
maintenance and construction were allocated and expended. The work undertaken by the
Department, receipts of license fees, disbursements of the Department, and other financial
information relevant to illustrate the Department's financial condition during the previous fiscal
year. For maintenance and construction work undertaken by the Department, the report shall also
include expenditures of both State and federal funds and shall be in sufficient detail that the
county can be identified. A full account of each road project shall be kept by and under the
direction of the Department of Transportation or its representatives, to ascertain at any time the
expenditures and the liabilities against all projects; also records of contracts and force account
work. The account records, together with all supporting documents, shall be open at all times to
the inspection of the Governor or road authorities of any county, or their authorized
representatives, and copies thereof shall be furnished such officials upon request.
…."
Page 4 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECKS FOR DRIVERS PROVIDING TRANSPORTATION
SERVICES TO CHILDREN PURSUANT TO CONTRACTS WITH LOCAL BOARDS
OF EDUCATION
SECTION 12.(a) G.S. 115C-332 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-332. School personnel criminal history checks.
…
(b) Each Except as provided in subsection (j) of this section, each local board of education
shall adopt a policy on whether and under what circumstances an applicant for a school personnel
position shall be required to be checked for a criminal history before the applicant is offered an
unconditional job. Each local board of education shall apply its policy uniformly in requiring
applicants for school personnel positions to be checked for a criminal history. A local board of
education that requires a criminal history check for an applicant may employ an applicant
conditionally while the board is checking the person's criminal history and making a decision
based on the results of the check.
A local board of education shall not require an applicant to pay for the criminal history check
authorized under this subsection.
…
(j) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the following
provisions apply to a local board of education that contracts with a person under G.S. 115C-253
to provide transportation services to students:
(1) The local board of education shall require an individual to submit to a criminal
history check before allowing that individual to act as a driver pursuant to a
contract under G.S. 115C-253. The local board of education may satisfy this
requirement by requesting and receiving a previously completed criminal
history check from another local board of education as provided in subsection
(k) of this section.
(2) The local board of education shall share the results of the criminal history
check with another local board of education upon request of the other local
board of education as provided in subsection (k) of this section.
(3) If allowed under federal law, the local board of education may delegate any
of the duties under subsection (d) of this section to another person.
(4) The local board of education may require the individual to pay for a criminal
history check or fingerprinting authorized under this section.
(k) Upon request of a local board of education, another local board of education that
previously conducted a criminal history check under this section shall confirm, on a form
developed by the State Bureau of Investigation, whether any disqualifying offenses were reported
in the results of the criminal history check, provided all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(1) The previous criminal history check was conducted no more than three years
prior to the date of the request under this subsection.
(2) The individual who is the subject of the criminal history check has provided
written consent for the release of information on a form provided by the State
Bureau of Investigation that includes language that authorizes the disclosure
of criminal history results between local school boards for the purpose of
complying with employment or contracting requirements in a public school
unit.
(3) The local board of education requesting the results of the criminal history
check under this subsection submits its request using a form provided by the
State Bureau of Investigation that identifies the individual who is the subject
of the criminal history check and confirms that the information is being sought
for the purpose of meeting employment or contracting requirements in a
public school unit."
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 5

SECTION 12.(b) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to
contracts for transportation services for students beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.
AUTHORIZE USE OF ELECTRONIC SPEED-MEASURING SYSTEMS TO DETECT
SPEED LIMIT VIOLATIONS IN SCHOOL ZONES
SECTION 13.(a) Chapter 160A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 160A-300.4. Use of electronic speed-measuring systems to enforce speed limits in school
zones.
(a) An electronic speed-measuring system is a mobile or fixed device consisting of an
automated traffic camera and sensor capable of measuring speed and producing one or more
digital photographs of a motor vehicle violating a posted speed limit.
(b) An electronic speed-measuring system shall be approved, calibrated, and tested for
accuracy in accordance with G.S. 8-50.4.
(c) Any electronic speed-measuring system installed or in use on a street or highway shall
be identified by appropriate advance warning signs conspicuously posted not more than 1,000
feet from the location of an electronic speed-measuring system. Signs shall comply with
G.S. 136-30. An electronic speed-measuring system installed on Department of Transportation
right-of-way must be approved by the Department. No approval for use of Department
right-of-way under this subsection shall abrogate the Department's ownership and control of the
right-of-way. The Department may adopt policies and rules necessary to implement this
subsection.
(d) A municipality may adopt ordinances for the civil enforcement of G.S. 20-141.1 by
means of an electronic speed-measuring system. Notwithstanding the provisions of
G.S. 20-141.1 and G.S. 20-176, in the event that a municipality adopts an ordinance pursuant to
this section, a violation of G.S. 20-141.1 detected by an electronic speed-measuring system shall
not be an infraction if a citation is issued in accordance with this subsection. An ordinance
authorized by this subsection shall provide that:
(1) The owner of a vehicle shall be responsible for a violation unless the owner
can furnish evidence that the vehicle was, at the time of the violation, in the
care, custody, or control of another person. Notification of the violation shall
be given in the form of a citation issued to the owner of the vehicle no more
than 60 days after the date of the violation. The owner of the vehicle shall not
be responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle furnishes, within
30 days of notification of the violation, to the officials or agents of the
municipality that issued the citation either of the following:
a. An affidavit stating the name and address of the person or company
who leased, rented, or otherwise had the care, custody, or control of
the vehicle at the time of the violation. If the owner provides an
affidavit under this sub-subdivision, the identified person or company
may be issued a citation complying with the requirements of
subdivision (3) of this subsection.
b. An affidavit stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time of the
violation, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person who
did not have permission of the owner to use the vehicle.
(2) A violation detected by an electronic speed-measuring system shall be deemed
a noncriminal violation for which a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
($250.00) shall be assessed and for which no points authorized by
G.S. 20-16(c) or G.S. 58-36-65 shall be assigned to the owner or driver of the
vehicle.
(3) The citation shall contain all of the following:
Page 6 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

a. The recorded image of the vehicle speeding.
b. The vehicle registration number and state of issuance.
c. The date, time, and location of the violation.
d. The recorded speed.
e. A copy of a certificate sworn to or affirmed by a sworn law
enforcement officer authorized to enforce the speed limit in the
applicable school zone stating that, based upon inspection of
photographically recorded images, the owner's vehicle was operated
in violation of G.S. 20-141.1.
f. The process for paying the civil penalty or contesting responsibility
for the violation.
(4) The citation shall be processed by officials or agents of the municipality and
shall be served by any method permitted for service of process pursuant to
G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, or by
first-class mail to the address of the registered owner of the vehicle. If the
owner fails to pay the civil penalty or to respond to the citation within 30 days
of receiving the citation, the owner waives the right to contest responsibility
for the violation and is subject to an additional penalty not to exceed fifty
dollars ($50.00). The municipality may establish procedures for the collection
of these penalties and may recover the penalties by civil action in the nature
of debt.
(5) The municipality shall provide a nonjudicial administrative hearing process to
review contested citations or penalties issued or assessed under this section. If
the decision is adverse to the person contesting the citation, the decision shall
contain instructions explaining the manner and the time within which the
decision may be appealed. A person may appeal the decision to the district
court in the county where the violation occurred within 30 days of notification
of a final decision by the municipality. Enforcement of an adverse decision
shall be stayed pending the outcome of a timely appeal.
(6) If the registered owner of a motor vehicle who receives a citation fails to pay
a penalty imposed under this section when due, the Division of Motor
Vehicles shall refuse to register the motor vehicle in accordance with
G.S. 20-54(14). The municipality shall coordinate and establish procedures
for providing appropriate notice to the Division of Motor Vehicles.
(e) A municipality, local board of education, and law enforcement agency may enter into
a local agreement pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes that
is necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose of this section. Any agreement entered into
pursuant to this subsection may include provisions on cost-sharing and reimbursement to which
the municipality, local board of education, or law enforcement agency freely and voluntarily
agree for the purposes of effectuating this section."
SECTION 13.(b) Chapter 153A of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 153A-246.1. Use of electronic speed-measuring systems to enforce speed limits in school
zones.
(a) An electronic speed-measuring system is a mobile or fixed device consisting of an
automated traffic camera and sensor capable of measuring speed and producing one or more
digital photographs of a motor vehicle violating a posted speed limit.
(b) An electronic speed-measuring system shall be approved, calibrated, and tested for
accuracy in accordance with G.S. 8-50.4.
(c) Any electronic speed-measuring system installed or in use on a street or highway shall
be identified by appropriate advance warning signs conspicuously posted not more than 1,000
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 7

feet from the location of an electronic speed-measuring system. Signs shall comply with
G.S. 136-30. An electronic speed-measuring system installed on Department of Transportation
right-of-way must be approved by the Department. No approval for use of Department
right-of-way under this subsection shall abrogate the Department's ownership and control of the
right-of-way. The Department may adopt policies and rules necessary to implement this
subsection.
(d) A county may adopt ordinances for the civil enforcement of G.S. 20-141.1 by means
of an electronic speed-measuring system. Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 20-141.1 and
G.S. 20-176, in the event that a county adopts an ordinance pursuant to this section, a violation
of G.S. 20-141.1 detected by an electronic speed-measuring system shall not be an infraction if
a citation is issued in accordance with this subsection. An ordinance authorized by this subsection
shall provide that:
(1) The owner of a vehicle shall be responsible for a violation unless the owner
can furnish evidence that the vehicle was, at the time of the violation, in the
care, custody, or control of another person. Notification of the violation shall
be given in the form of a citation issued to the owner of the vehicle no more
than 60 days after the date of the violation. The owner of the vehicle shall not
be responsible for the violation if the owner of the vehicle furnishes, within
30 days of notification of the violation, to the officials or agents of the county
that issued the citation either of the following:
a. An affidavit stating the name and address of the person or company
who leased, rented, or otherwise had the care, custody, or control of
the vehicle at the time of the violation. If the owner provides an
affidavit under this sub-subdivision, the identified person or company
may be issued a citation for the violation complying with the
requirements of subdivision (3) of this subsection.
b. An affidavit stating that the vehicle involved was, at the time of the
violation, stolen or in the care, custody, or control of some person who
did not have permission of the owner to use the vehicle.
(2) A violation detected by an electronic speed-measuring system shall be deemed
a noncriminal violation for which a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars
($250.00) shall be assessed and for which no points authorized by
G.S. 20-16(c) or G.S. 58-36-65 shall be assigned to the owner or driver of the
vehicle.
(3) The citation shall contain all of the following:
a. The recorded image of the vehicle speeding.
b. The vehicle registration number and state of issuance.
c. The date, time, and location of the violation.
d. The recorded speed.
e. A copy of a certificate sworn to or affirmed by a sworn law
enforcement officer authorized to enforce the speed limit in the
applicable school zone stating that, based upon inspection of
photographically recorded images, the owner's vehicle was operated
in violation of G.S. 20-141.1.
f. The process for paying the civil penalty or contesting responsibility
for the violation.
(4) The citation shall be processed by officials or agents of the county and shall
be served by any method permitted for service of process pursuant to
G.S. 1A-1, Rule 4 of the North Carolina Rules of Civil Procedure, or by
first-class mail to the address of the registered owner of the vehicle. If the
owner fails to pay the civil penalty or to respond to the citation within 30 days
Page 8 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

of receiving the citation, the owner waives the right to contest responsibility
for the violation and is subject to an additional penalty not to exceed fifty
dollars ($50.00). The county may establish procedures for the collection of
these penalties and may recover the penalties by civil action in the nature of
debt.
(5) The county shall provide a nonjudicial administrative hearing process to
review contested citations or penalties issued or assessed under this section. If
the decision is adverse to the person contesting the citation, the decision shall
contain instructions explaining the manner and the time within which the
decision may be appealed. A person may appeal the decision to the district
court in the county where the violation occurred within 30 days of notification
of a final decision by the municipality. Enforcement of an adverse decision
shall be stayed pending the outcome of a timely appeal.
(6) If the registered owner of a motor vehicle who receives a citation fails to pay
a penalty imposed under this section when due, the Division of Motor
Vehicles shall refuse to register the motor vehicle in accordance with
G.S. 20-54(14). The county shall coordinate and establish procedures for
providing appropriate notice to the Division of Motor Vehicles.
(e) A county, local board of education, and law enforcement agency may enter into a
local agreement pursuant to Part 1 of Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes that is
necessary and proper to effectuate the purpose of this section. Any agreement entered into
pursuant to this subsection may include provisions on cost-sharing and reimbursement to which
the county, local board of education, or law enforcement agency freely and voluntarily agree for
the purposes of effectuating this section."
SECTION 13.(c) Chapter 8 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 8-50.4. Results of electronic speed-measuring instruments to enforce speed limits in
school zones; admissibility.
(a) The results of the use of an electronic speed-measuring system as described in
G.S. 160A-300.4 and G.S. 153A-246.1 shall be admissible as evidence in nonjudicial
administrative hearings held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5) or G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5).
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the results of an
electronic speed-measuring system are not admissible unless all of the following are established:
(1) The electronic speed-measuring system employed was approved for use by
the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards
Commission and the Secretary of Public Safety pursuant to G.S. 17C-6.
(2) The electronic speed-measuring system was calibrated and tested for accuracy
in accordance with the standards established by the North Carolina Criminal
Justice Education and Training Standards Commission and the Secretary of
Public Safety for that particular system.
(c) All electronic speed-measuring systems shall be calibrated and tested in accordance
with standards established by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training
Standards Commission and the Secretary of Public Safety. A written certificate by a technician
certified by the North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission
showing that a test was made within the required testing period and that the system was accurate
shall be competent and prima facie evidence of those facts in a nonjudicial administrative hearing
held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5) or G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5).
(d) In every nonjudicial administrative hearing held pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(5)
or G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(5), where the results of an electronic speed-measuring system are sought
to be admitted, notice shall be taken of the rules approving the electronic speed-measuring system
and the procedures for calibration or testing for accuracy of the system."
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 9

SECTION 13.(d) G.S. 17C-6(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(13b) In conjunction with the Secretary of Public Safety, approve use of specific
models and types of electronic speed-measuring systems as described in
G.S. 160A-300.4(a) and G.S. 153A-246.1(a) and establish standards for
calibration and testing for accuracy of each approved system.
…."
SECTION 13.(e) G.S. 20-54 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-54. Authority for refusing registration or certificate of title.
The Division shall refuse registration or issuance of a certificate of title or any transfer of
registration upon any of the following grounds:
…
(14) The Division has been notified (i) pursuant to G.S. 153A-246.1(d)(6) that the
owner of the vehicle has failed to pay any penalty imposed under
G.S. 153A-246.1 or (ii) pursuant to G.S. 160A-300.4(d)(6) that the owner of
the vehicle has failed to pay any penalty imposed under G.S. 160A-300.4."
SECTION 13.(f) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
CODIFY LIMITS OF EXISTING RIGHTS-OF-WAY AND EASEMENTS
MAINTAINED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO PROVIDE
CLARITY AND CONSISTENCY FOR PERSONS IMPACTED BY PREVIOUS
PROPERTY TRANSACTIONS THAT WERE NOT DOCUMENTED OR RECORDED
IN ACCORDANCE WITH CURRENT REQUIREMENTS
SECTION 14.(a) Article 2A of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 136-44.18. Define boundaries of certain rights-of-way and easements.
(a) Right-of-Way Boundaries. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary,
for any roadway for which the Department has responsibility for maintenance, but there is no
instrument of conveyance describing the boundaries of the right-of-way, the boundary of the
right-of-way shall be defined according to the typical maintenance limits that are Department
practice.
(b) Easement Boundaries. – Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, for
any roadway for which the Department has responsibility for maintenance, but there is no
instrument of conveyance describing the boundaries of the easement, the boundary of the
easement shall be defined according to the typical maintenance limits that are Department
practice.
(c) Conditions Imposed on Developers. – If the Department, as a condition of granting a
permit, requires a developer to construct offsite improvements, and by constructing offsite
improvements there is a need for the developer to acquire a right-of-way or easement and the
developer is unable to do so, the Department shall coordinate with the developer to revise the
development or development access such that no additional right-of-way or easement is needed.
The Department shall comply with the requirement set forth in this subsection within a reasonable
amount of time after the developer provides evidence to the Department that the developer made
a good-faith effort to acquire the required right-of-way or easement. For purposes of this
subsection, the term "good faith effort" includes providing a copy of a certified letter to all
affected property owners and all responses received from those property owners.
(d) Construction. – Nothing in this section shall be construed as allowing (i) the
Department to require a Hold Harmless declaration from a developer or (ii) the Department to
Page 10 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

take any action that would constitute a taking of property in violation of the Constitution of this
State or of the United States."
SECTION 14.(b) By October 1, 2025, the Department of Transportation shall submit
a report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee (i) describing the
maintenance limits used by the Department in G.S. 136-44.18, as enacted by subsection (a) of
this section, and (ii) recommending any additional legislative changes that may further aid in
defining the boundaries of rights-of-way and easements subject to G.S. 136-44.18.
SECTION 14.(c) The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules, or amend their
rules, consistent with the provisions of this section. The Department may use the procedure set
forth in G.S. 150B-21.1 to adopt or amend any rules as required under this section.
SECTION 14.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.
NO MOWING IN RIGHT-OF-WAY WHEN PLACEMENT OF POLITICAL SIGNS IS
PERMITTED OR DURING THE MONTH OF MAY
SECTION 15.(a) G.S. 136-32(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Compliant Political Signs Permitted. – During the period beginning on the 30th day
before the beginning date of early voting under G.S. 163-166.40 and ending on the 10th day after
the primary or election day, persons may place political signs in the right-of-way of the State
highway system as provided in this section. Signs must be placed in compliance with subsection
(d) of this section and must be removed by the end of the period prescribed in this subsection.
Any political sign remaining in the right-of-way of the State highway system more than 30 days
after the end of the period prescribed in this subsection shall be deemed unlawfully placed and
abandoned property, and a person may remove and dispose of such political sign without penalty.
The Department of Transportation shall not schedule mowing in any right-of-way in which the
placement of political signs is permitted under this section during the period prescribed in this
subsection."
SECTION 15.(b) G.S. 136-28.12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 136-28.12. Litter removal coordinated with mowing of highway rights-of-way.
(a) For State-maintained roads, the Department of Transportation shall coordinate litter
removal and mowing as follows:
(1) If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the primary road system,
the Department shall schedule the removal of litter before the right-of-way is
mowed.
(2) If the highway right-of-way to be mowed is part of the secondary road system,
the Department shall schedule, to the extent practicable, the removal of litter
before the right-of-way is mowed.
(3) The Department shall not schedule mowing of highway rights-of-way during
the month of May.
(b) The Department shall require as a term of any contract to mow or remove litter that
the contracting party agree to the provisions in subsection (a) of this section."
MODIFY CAP ON CERTAIN PUBLIC-PRIVATE PARTNERSHIPS
SECTION 16. G.S. 136-18(39a)a. reads as rewritten:
"(39a)a. The Department of Transportation or and Turnpike Authority, as
applicable, Authority may enter into up to three six agreements with a private
entity as provided under subdivision (39) of this section for which the
provisions of this section apply."
TRUCKS IN LEFT LANE
SECTION 17.(a) G.S. 20-146 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 11

"(f) Except when entering or exiting the highway or avoiding a hazard or to pass, a motor
vehicle having a gross vehicle weight rating (GVWR) of 26,001 pounds or more shall not operate
in the left most lane of a controlled-access highway with six or more lanes."
SECTION 17.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
IMPOSE TEMPORARY MORATORIUM ON THE EXPIRATION OF CERTAIN
CLASS C DRIVERS LICENSES
SECTION 18.(a) The General Assembly finds that there is a backlog of drivers
unable to renew their drivers licenses in person. It is the intent of this section to eliminate that
backlog.
SECTION 18.(b) Notwithstanding G.S. 20-7, or any other State law to the contrary,
a Class C regular drivers license shall remain valid for purposes of establishing the license
holder's driving privilege for a period of up to two years after its expiration. This section shall
not apply to any drivers license that is currently canceled, revoked, or suspended.
SECTION 18.(c) The Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee shall
review any studies or audits conducted or commissioned by, or any recommendations made by,
the Committee, the North Carolina Department of Transportation, or the Office of the State
Auditor to address staffing shortages, employee retention, outdated technology, and any other
structural or systemic issues that are contributing to excessive wait times and delays at the
Division of Motor Vehicles. The Committee shall report its findings, together with any
recommended legislation, to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly.
SECTION 18.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to Class
C regular drivers licenses that expire on or after that date. This section expires December 31,
2027.
MODIFY AGE OF MOTOR VEHICLES THAT SECONDARY METALS RECYCLERS
OR SALVAGE YARDS MAY PURCHASE WITHOUT A CERTIFICATE OF TITLE
SECTION 19.(a) G.S. 20-62.1(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Records for Scrap or Parts. – A secondary metals recycler, as defined in
G.S. 66-420(8), and a salvage yard, as defined in G.S. 20-137.7(6), purchasing motor vehicles
solely for the purposes of dismantling or wrecking such motor vehicles for the recovery of scrap
metal or for the sale of parts only, shall comply with the provisions of G.S. 20-61 and subsection
(a1) of this section, provided, however, that a secondary metals recycler or salvage yard may
purchase a motor vehicle without a certificate of title, if the motor vehicle is 10 12 model years
old or older and the secondary metals recycler or salvage yard comply with the following
requirements:
(1) Maintain a record on a form, or in a format, as approved by the Division of
Motor Vehicles (DMV) of all purchase transactions of motor vehicles. The
following information shall be maintained for transactions of motor vehicles:
a. The name, address, and contact information of the secondary metals
recycler or salvage yard.
b. The name, initials, or other identification of the individual entering the
information.
c. The date of the transaction.
d. A description of the motor vehicle, including the year, make, and
model to the extent practicable.
e. The vehicle identification number (VIN) of the vehicle.
f. The amount of consideration given for the motor vehicle.
g. A written statement signed by the seller or the seller's agent certifying
that (i) the seller or the seller's agent has the lawful right to sell and
Page 12 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

dispose of the motor vehicle, (ii) the motor vehicle is at least 10 12
model years old, and (iii) the motor vehicle is not subject to any
security interest or lien.
g1. A written statement that the motor vehicle will be scrapped or crushed
for disposal or dismantled for parts only.
h. The name, address, and drivers license number of the person from
whom the motor vehicle is being purchased.
i. A photocopy or electronic scan of a valid drivers license or
identification card issued by the DMV of the seller of the motor
vehicle, or seller's agent, to the secondary metals recycler or salvage
yard, or in lieu thereof, any other identification card containing a
photograph of the seller as issued by any state or federal agency of the
United States: provided, that if the buyer has a copy of the seller's
photo identification on file, the buyer may reference the identification
that is on file, without making a separate photocopy for each
transaction. If seller has no identification as described in this
sub-subdivision, the secondary metals recycler or salvage yard shall
not complete the transaction.
…."
SECTION 19.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025.
DIVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLES MODERNIZATION MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 19.5.(a) Section 19.2(f) of S.L. 2024-45 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 19.2.(f) No later than July 1, 2025, January 1, 2026, the Division, in consultation
with DIT, shall use the findings of the evaluation required by this section to select a vendor to
oversee and manage implementation of the cloud-based operating system. The selected vendor,
Division, in consultation with the Division selected vendor and DIT, shall report to the Joint
Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative Commission on
Governmental Operations, the chairs of the House and Senate Transportation Appropriations
Committees, and the Fiscal Research Division on a quarterly basis. Each report shall include an
update on the status of the Division's modernization efforts measured against targets and
objectives identified in the evaluation.objectives."
SECTION 19.5.(b) No later than October 1, 2025, the Division of Motor Vehicles
shall report to the Joint Legislative Transportation Oversight Committee on the status of its
evaluation of potential vendors and selection of the vendor required by Section 19.2(f) of S.L.
2024-45, as amended by subsection (a) of this section.
USE AND STUDY OF NATIVE PLANTS
SECTION 20.(a) G.S. 136-133.1(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) Removal of trees and vegetation of any age, including complete removal, except for
native dogwoods, shall be permitted within the cut or removal zone established in subsection (a)
of this section if the applicant for the selective vegetation removal permit, in lieu of compliance
with subsection (d) of this section, agrees to submit to the Department a plan for beautification
and replanting related to the site for which the vegetation permit request is made. The Department
shall develop rules for compensatory replanting, including the criteria for determining which
sites qualify for replanting, and shall, in consultation with the applicant and local government
representatives, determine which sites must be replanted, and the types of plants and trees to be
replanted. replanted, in accordance with G.S. 136-18(9). The replanting and maintenance shall
be conducted by the applicant or his or her agents in accordance with the rules adopted by the
Department. If the conditions detailed in this subsection are agreed to by the applicant and
approved by the Department, there shall be no reimbursement to the Department under
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 13

G.S. 136-93.2 for removal of trees that existed at the time the outdoor sign was erected, nor shall
the applicant be required to remove two nonconforming outdoor advertising signs for removal of
existing trees at the site."
SECTION 20.(b) The Department of Transportation and the Department of Natural
and Cultural Resources, in consultation with North Carolina State University and North Carolina
Agricultural and Technical State University, shall study and develop (i) a list of native grasses,
plants, and seeds appropriate for use in place of nonnative turf grasses and nonnative grasses,
plants, and seeds used for the purpose of soil and slope stabilization for erosion control and (ii)
a list of high-threat invasive plant species and a plan for removing existing invasive plant species
from State parks and highway rights-of-way. The Department of Transportation and the
Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall provide a report on the study and
development of the lists and plan to the 2026 Regular Session of the 2025 General Assembly
upon its convening.
INCREASE MAXIMUM ALLOWABLE NUMBER OF WINDOW TINTING MEDICAL
EXCEPTION PERMITS
SECTION 21. G.S. 20-127(f) reads as rewritten:
"(f) Medical Exception. – A person who suffers from a medical condition that causes the
person to be photosensitive to visible light may obtain a medical exception permit. To obtain a
permit, an applicant shall apply in writing to the Drivers Medical Evaluation Program and have
his or her doctor complete the required medical evaluation form provided by the Division. The
permit shall be valid for five years from the date of issue, unless a shorter time is directed by the
Drivers Medical Evaluation Program. The renewal shall require a medical recertification that the
person continues to suffer from a medical condition requiring tinting.
A person may receive no more than two four medical exception permits that are valid at any
one time. A permit issued under this subsection shall specify the vehicle to which it applies, the
windows that may be tinted, and the permitted levels of tinting. The permit shall be carried in the
vehicle to which it applies when the vehicle is driven on a highway.
The Division shall give a person who receives a medical exception permit a sticker to place
on the lower left-hand corner of the rear window of the vehicle to which it applies. The sticker
shall be designed to give prospective purchasers of the vehicle notice that the windows of the
vehicle do not meet the requirements of G.S. 20-127(b), and shall be placed between the window
and the tinting when the tinting is installed. The Division shall adopt rules regarding the
specifications of the medical exception sticker. Failure to display the sticker is an infraction
punishable by a two hundred dollar ($200.00) fine."
ELIMINATE REQUIRED INSPECTION OF WINDOW TINT AND REQUIRE
DRIVERS WITH TINTED WINDOWS TO ROLL WINDOW DOWN ON APPROACH
OF LAW ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 22.(a) G.S. 20-183.3(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Safety. – A safety inspection of a motor vehicle consists of an inspection of the
following equipment to determine if the vehicle has the equipment required by Part 9 of Article
3 of this Chapter and if the equipment is in a safe operating condition:
…
(5) Windows and windshield wipers, as required by G.S. 20-127. To determine if
a vehicle window meets the window tinting restrictions, a safety inspection
mechanic must first determine, based on use of an automotive film check card
or knowledge of window tinting techniques, if after-factory tint has been
applied to the window. If after-factory tint has been applied, the mechanic
must use a light meter approved by the Commissioner to determine if the
Page 14 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

window meets the window tinting restrictions.Windshield wipers, as required
by G.S. 20-127(a).
…."
SECTION 22.(b) G.S. 20-183.7(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Fee Amount. – When a fee applies to an inspection of a vehicle or the issuance of an
electronic inspection authorization, the fee must be collected. The following fees apply to an
inspection of a vehicle and the issuance of an electronic inspection authorization:
Type Inspection Authorization
Safety Only $12.75 $ .85
Emissions and Safety 23.75 6.25.
The fee for performing an inspection of a vehicle applies when an inspection is performed,
regardless of whether the vehicle passes the inspection. The fee for an electronic inspection
authorization applies when an electronic inspection authorization is issued to a vehicle. The fee
for inspecting after-factory tinted windows shall be ten dollars ($10.00), and the fee applies only
to an inspection performed with a light meter after a safety inspection mechanic determined that
the window had after-factory tint. A safety inspection mechanic shall not inspect an after-factory
tinted window of a vehicle for which the Division has issued a medical exception permit pursuant
to G.S. 20-127(f).
A vehicle that is inspected at an inspection station and fails the inspection is entitled to be
reinspected at the same station at any time within 60 days of the failed inspection without paying
another inspection fee.
The inspection fee for an emissions and safety inspection set out in this subsection is the
maximum amount that an inspection station or an inspection mechanic may charge for an
emissions and safety inspection of a vehicle. An inspection station or an inspection mechanic
may charge the maximum amount or any lesser amount for an emissions and safety inspection
of a vehicle. The inspection fee for a safety only inspection set out in this subsection may not be
increased or decreased. The authorization fees set out in this subsection may not be increased or
decreased."
SECTION 22.(c) G.S. 20-183.7B(b)(9)o. and G.S. 20-183.7B(c)(7)o. are repealed.
SECTION 22.(d) G.S. 20-127 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(g) The driver of a vehicle with tinted windows shall roll down the driver side window
upon the approach of a law enforcement officer. If the officer approaches from the passenger
side, the driver shall roll down the passenger window."
SECTION 22.(e) This section becomes effective December 1, 2025, and applies to
offenses committed on or after that date.
PROGRESSIVE DESIGN-BUILD DELIVERY METHOD PILOT PROGRAM
MODIFICATIONS
SECTION 23. Section 2(a) of S.L. 2024-15 reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 2.(a) Definition. – For purposes of this section, the term "Progressive
Design-Build" means a project delivery method that uses a stepped, or progressive qualifications
based, based selection process, followed by a progression to a contract price. The Progressive
Design-Build Team is selected exclusively based on qualifications, with or without consideration
of schedule or costs, and delivers the project in two distinct phases with two or more separate
contracts. The Progressive Design-Build Team is initially under contract for preconstruction
activities, including developing preliminary designs, performing constructability reviews, and
developing construction schedules and pricing. If the Department of Transportation and the
Progressive Design-Build Team reach agreement on a guaranteed maximum construction cost,
the Department of Transportation and the Progressive Design-Build Team will execute a second
contract one or more contracts for completion of the preliminary designs and construction of the
project."
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 15

TRANSFER CERTAIN NONSWORN PERSONNEL FROM THE LICENSE AND
THEFT BUREAU OF THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO THE STATE
HIGHWAY PATROL AND ESTABLISH NEW BUDGET FUNDS
SECTION 23.5.(a) The following positions, including the salaries, property, and
other funds allocated for the positions, are transferred from the Department of Transportation,
Division of Motor Vehicles License and Theft Bureau, to the State Highway Patrol:
Position Position Number
Program Coordinator III 60030052
Administrative Specialist II 60030907
Administrative Specialist I 60031075
Program Analyst I 60031189
Program Analyst I 60031341
Administrative Specialist II 60029790
Administrative Specialist I 60031033
Program Coordinator II 60030760
Program Coordinator II 60030921
Electronics Technician II 60030924
Administrative Specialist I 60030909
Program Coordinator III 60092620
Program Coordinator III 60030920
Program Coordinator III 60090052
Program Supervisor I 60092613
Program Supervisor I 60092614
Program Coordinator III 60092615
Program Coordinator III 60092616
Program Coordinator III 60092617
Program Coordinator III 60092618
Program Coordinator III 60092619
Program Coordinator III 60030904
Program Coordinator III 60092623
Program Coordinator III 60092625
Program Coordinator III 60092626
Program Coordinator III 60092627
Program Coordinator I 60029918
Program Supervisor I 60030890
Program Coordinator III 60030922
Program Coordinator I 60031074
Program Coordinator I 60031114
Program Coordinator I 60031142
Program Coordinator I 60031143
Administrative Specialist I 60030847
Program Coordinator III 60030894
Administrative Specialist I 60030899
Program Supervisor I 60030917
Administrative Specialist I 60030934
Administrative Specialist I 60031312
Program Coordinator III 65037940
Program Coordinator III 65037942
Program Supervisor I 65037786
Program Coordinator III 65037941
Page 16 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391

Program Supervisor I 60030929
Program Coordinator III 60030844
Program Coordinator I 60030893
Program Coordinator III 60030898
Program Coordinator III 60031077
Program Coordinator I 60031284
Program Coordinator I 60031320
Program Coordinator III 60030905
Program Coordinator III 60092628
Administrative Specialist I 60030937
Administrative Specialist I 60030962
Administrative Specialist I 60029801
Administrative Specialist I 60031024
Administrative Specialist I 60030997
Administrative Specialist I 60031026
Administrative Specialist I 60030996
Administrative Specialist I 60031140
Administrative Specialist I 60030995
Administrative Specialist I 60031193
Program Coordinator III 60031112
Program Coordinator III 60031115
Administrative Specialist I 60031076
Deputy Commissioner 60030882
SECTION 23.5.(b) Within the Highway Fund (Budget Code # 84210), the Office of
State Budget and Management and the State Controller shall establish a new budget fund for
ongoing support of: (i) all positions transferred from the Department of Transportation to the
State Highway Patrol pursuant to Subpart III-E of S.L. 2024-57 and subsection (a) of this section
and (ii) the recurring transfer of funds from the Department of Transportation to the State
Highway Patrol required by Section 3E.3(b) of S.L. 2024-57.
SECTION 23.5.(c) The Office of State Budget and Management and the State
Controller shall create a new budget fund within the State Highway Patrol for all funds
transferred in accordance with Section 3E.3(b) of S.L. 2024-57 and subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 23.5.(d) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.
AMEND REQUIREMENTS FOR COMMERCIAL DRIVER TRAINING SCHOOLS
ADMINISTERING ROAD TESTS
SECTION 24. G.S. 20-329 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-329. Commercial driver training school road test certification.
(a) A licensed commercial driver training school is authorized to administer road tests
required for licensure under G.S. 20-11(d)(3) only when certified under this section by the
Division.
(b) A person that successfully passes a road test required for licensure administered by a
commercial driver training school may submit proof to the Division that the person passed the
road test, in a format specified by the Division, for the purpose of meeting the requirement of
G.S. 20-11(d)(3).
(c) The Commissioner may adopt rules for school certification to administer road tests,
including requirements concerning location, equipment, instructors, schedule of fees and
charges, insurance, bond or other security in such sum and with such provisions as the
Commissioner deems necessary to protect adequately the interests of the public, and such other
matters as the Commissioner may prescribe.The requirements and standards of a road test
administered by a commercial driver training school under this section shall be the same as if the
Senate Bill 391 Session Law 2025-47 Page 17

road test was administered by the Division. The Division shall adopt and provide any necessary
forms for use by commercial driver training schools for the administration of the road test and
reporting the results of the test to the Division. The Division may adopt rules and policies
necessary for the implementation of this section. Commercial driver training schools may charge
a reasonable fee for administering a road test and reporting the results to the Division pursuant
to this section."
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 26. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
In the General Assembly read three times and ratified this the 30th day of June, 2025.
s/ Phil Berger
President Pro Tempore of the Senate
s/ Donna McDowell White
Presiding Officer of the House of Representatives
s/ Josh Stein
Governor
Approved 2:57 p.m. this 1st day of July, 2025
Page 18 Session Law 2025-47 Senate Bill 391